Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Certificate of Authority.

§79-4-15.01.
Authority to transact business required.

A foreign corporation may not transact business in this state until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State.

The following activities, among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of subsection (a):

Maintaining, defending or settling any proceeding;

Holding meetings of the board of directors or shareholders or carrying on other activities concerning internal corporate affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange and registration of the corporation’s own securities or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages and security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the debts;

Owning, without more, real or personal property;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty (30) days and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature;

Transacting business in interstate commerce;

Being a shareholder in a corporation or a foreign corporation that transacts business in this state;

Being a limited partner of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership that is transacting business in this state;

Being a member or manager of a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company that is transacting business in this state.

The list of activities in subsection (b) is not exhaustive.

A foreign corporation which is general partner of any general or limited partnership, which partnership is transacting business in this state, is hereby declared to be transacting business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.01; Laws, 1990, ch. 538, § 9; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 38, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (b)(12) through (14); and rewrote (d).

Consequences of transacting business without authority, see § 79-4-15.02.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-363 through 79-11-381.

Establishing or acquiring out-of-state trust institution, conditions for approval, see § 81-27-2.105.

If a foreign corporation is not transacting business in Mississippi, a certificate of authority is not required in order to maintain an action in Mississippi, as demonstrated by § 79-4-15.02(c) which states that a court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign corporation until it determines whether the corporation requires a certificate of authority; since the court is granted some amount of discretion, it is apparent that not all foreign corporations require a certificate to maintain an action. Mississippi Ins. Guar. Ass'n v. Harkins & Co., 652 So. 2d 732, 1995 Miss. LEXIS 145 (Miss. 1995).

A foreign corporation was not transacting business in Mississippi, and therefore did not need a certificate of authority in order to maintain an action in Mississippi where the only business contact the corporation had with Mississippi was the actual commencement of the suit, since § 79-4-15.01(b)(1) states that simply maintaining, defending, or settling a proceeding does not constitute “transacting business.” Mississippi Ins. Guar. Ass'n v. Harkins & Co., 652 So. 2d 732, 1995 Miss. LEXIS 145 (Miss. 1995).

A foreign corporation domesticated in Mississippi under statute remains a resident of state of original incorporation for all jurisdictional purposes, state and federal, and is subject to attachment in Mississippi courts as a “nonresident,” since, for purpose of removing to federal court an action brought in state of domestication, a domesticated foreign corporation is a nonresident. Southern Motor Express Co. v. Magee Truck Lines, Inc., 181 Miss. 223, 177 So. 653, 1937 Miss. LEXIS 132 (Miss. 1937).

Shares of stock in Louisiana corporation, doing business and domesticated in Mississippi, have their situs for devolution purposes in this state. Ewing v. Warren, 144 Miss. 233, 109 So. 601, 1926 Miss. LEXIS 342 (Miss. 1926).

In a personal injury action against a domesticated foreign corporation, the trial court’s exercise of jurisdiction as an attachment in chancery on the grounds of nonresidency did not violate the corporation’s right to equal protection of the laws, even though it claimed to be a domestic corporation for all intents and purposes, where the state of incorporation retained, inter alia, supervisory power and the final authority to dissolve the corporation. Louisville & N. R. Co. v. Hasty, 360 So. 2d 925, 1978 Miss. LEXIS 2307 (Miss.), cert. denied, 439 U.S. 1003, 99 S. Ct. 614, 58 L. Ed. 2d 679, 1978 U.S. LEXIS 4129 (U.S. 1978).

A foreign corporation domesticated in Mississippi under statute remains a resident of state of original incorporation for all jurisdictional purposes, state and federal, and is subject to attachment in Mississippi courts as a “nonresident,” since, for the purpose of removing to federal court an action brought in state of domestication, a domesticated foreign corporation is a nonresident. Southern Motor Express Co. v. Magee Truck Lines, Inc., 181 Miss. 223, 177 So. 653, 1937 Miss. LEXIS 132 (Miss. 1937).

Foreign corporation seeking to maintain action for breach of contract was not barred under Miss Code § 79-3-247 [repealed] from bringing action for failure to have certificate of authority to do business in state where foreign corporation maintained no office or bank account in state and had no employees in state and where purpose of contract was for foreign corporation to manage hotel, thus bringing business within reach of Commerce Clause and within exception to definition of “transacting business” under § 79-3-211 [repealed]. Madden Management, Inc. v. First Equities Corp., 666 F. Supp. 96, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7872 (N.D. Miss. 1987).

If foreign corporation is qualified to do business in State of Mississippi, even though it may not be doing any business, its agent for process may be served and courts have personal jurisdiction over that corporation; actually doing business in state has nothing to do with personal jurisdiction where foreign corporation has qualified to do business in state; corporation qualifying to do business in state, under appropriate statutes, becomes like individual as far as suit is concerned. Read v. Sonat Offshore Drilling, Inc., 515 So. 2d 1229, 1987 Miss. LEXIS 2929 (Miss. 1987).

In a diversity action by a Florida construction company in federal district court for Mississippi, seeking to recover a construction contract debt from the surety, a Mississippi bank, the trial court committed reversible error when it granted the bank’s motion for dismissal on the grounds that the foreign company had engaged in intrastate commerce without qualifying to do so as required by Mississippi law, and thus, was precluded from maintaining an action in Mississippi state or federal court, where contract substantially related to interstate activities, where, under the National Bank Act, the bank was required to be sued where it was located, and where it would have been an impermissible burden on interstate commerce to permit Mississippi courtroom doors to remain closed to such foreign company on events and contracts substantially related to interstate activities. Diversacon Industries, Inc. v. National Bank of Commerce, 629 F.2d 1030, 1980 U.S. App. LEXIS 12640 (5th Cir. Miss. 1980).

A Georgia corporation was not barred from seeking relief in the Mississippi courts for an alleged breach of a restrictive covenant by one of its former employees, even though the claim arose out of the transaction of business in the state and even though plaintiff corporation had not first obtained a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State, where the record supported the trial court’s findings that plaintiff was engaged in interstate commerce and was thus exempted by subsections (d) and (e) of this section from the certificate requirements. Cheatham v. Kem Mfg. Corp., 372 So. 2d 1085, 1979 Miss. LEXIS 2148 (Miss. 1979).

Payment of the contractor’s privilege tax by a foreign corporation did not relieve it of the requirement that it obtain a certificate of authority to do business from the secretary of state and, absent such certificate, the contractor was not entitled to sue in state court to enforce a construction lien. Town & Country Plumbing Co. v. Delta Real Estate Development, Inc., 357 So. 2d 126, 1978 Miss. LEXIS 2491 (Miss. 1978).

An Arkansas corporation was doing business within the state where, of its chain of franchised retail stores, several were in Mississippi, and, with respect to a particular Mississippi store from which it sought recovery of franchise fees and other charges, evidence showed that the corporation had a contract right to control virtually the entire operation of the store and that it was in fact significantly involved in that operation. Barbee v. United Dollar Stores, Inc., 337 So. 2d 1277, 1976 Miss. LEXIS 1617 (Miss. 1976).

An Ohio corporation that had acted as purchaser and lessor of frozen drink machines, buying them from a Georgia corporation and leasing them to individuals in Mississippi who had agreed to lease them in an arrangement made through the Georgia corporation, was not “transacting” business within Mississippi within the meaning of § 79-3-247 [repealed] and could bring an action in the Mississippi district court to recover amounts due on the lease from the lessees. Xyoquip, Inc. v. Mims, 413 F. Supp. 962, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17295 (N.D. Miss. 1976).

In a suit filed by a foreign corporation having no certificate of authority to do business in this state, where the record showed that the only business that the plaintiff had transacted in this state was entering into the lease contract with the defendant which was the subject of the suit, the transaction sued upon fell within the exception set up in Code 1972, § 79-3-211(d) [repealed], and the plaintiff was therefore not barred from bringing suit by Code 1972, § 79-3-247 [repealed]. Mid--Continent Refrigerator Co. v. Starks, 298 So. 2d 714, 1974 Miss. LEXIS 1572 (Miss. 1974).

Diversity action brought by nonresident plaintiffs to recover a brokerage fee allegedly owed by the defendant for two loan commitments was not barred by Code 1972 § 79-3-247 [repealed] where the transactions involved fell within the exception found in Code 1972 § 79-3-211(e) [repealed]. Ivor B. Clark Co. v. Southern Business & Industrial Development Co., 399 F. Supp. 824, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6123 (S.D. Miss. 1974).

A foreign corporation not authorized by statute to do business in Mississippi cannot resort either to the state or to the federal court sitting within the state to enforce its rights unless they arose from and were exempted as a transaction in interstate commerce. Cone Mills Corp. v. Hurdle, 369 F. Supp. 426, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12865 (N.D. Miss. 1974).

Code 1942, § 5309-239, prohibiting foreign corporations lacking a certificate of authority to maintain any action, suit or proceeding in the state, is a punitive statute designed to penalize those foreign corporations doing business in the State of Mississippi without qualifying as required by Code 1942, § 5309-221. Alabama Live Poultry, Inc. v. Ervin, 246 So. 2d 915, 1971 Miss. LEXIS 1429 (Miss. 1971).

A foreign corporation’s negotiation and purchase of common stock in one or more subsidiary companies within Mississippi does not render it doing business within the purview of the qualification statutes, and the fact that acquisition of stock in other companies was an avowed purpose of the foreign corporation’s charter has no effect upon the operation of this rule. Mid-Continent Tel. Corp. v. Home Tel. Co., 307 F. Supp. 1014, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12626 (N.D. Miss. 1969).

The purchase or ownership of stock, even of a controlling interest, in a domestic corporation by a foreign corporation does not constitute doing business by the foreign corporation sufficient to subject it to service of process in the state of the subsidary’s operation. Mid-Continent Tel. Corp. v. Home Tel. Co., 307 F. Supp. 1014, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12626 (N.D. Miss. 1969).

That a foreign corporation entered into a service agreement with its Mississippi subsidiary whereby it furnishes to the subsidiary, upon its request, services in various areas requiring technical training and expertise and also sold to its subsidiary equipment and supplies, lends its money, and other financial assistance, local activities at least partly performed in Mississippi, these facts are insufficient to support the conclusion that the foreign corporation is “doing business” in the State of Mississippi. Mid-Continent Tel. Corp. v. Home Tel. Co., 307 F. Supp. 1014, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12626 (N.D. Miss. 1969).

A greater degree of business activity is required to bar a foreign corporation from Mississippi courts than is required to subject the same foreign corporation to local service of process under the state’s long arm statute. Mid-Continent Tel. Corp. v. Home Tel. Co., 307 F. Supp. 1014, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12626 (N.D. Miss. 1969).

A foreign corporation is “doing business” within the state where it performs acts (not excluded by the statute itself) that are within the functions of its corporate powers and the business so performed is substantial in scope, and the substantiality and scope of local activity are equated with some substantial part of its ordinary or customary business, usually continuous in the sense that it may be distinguished from merely casual, sporadic, or occasional transactions and isolated acts. Mid-Continent Tel. Corp. v. Home Tel. Co., 307 F. Supp. 1014, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12626 (N.D. Miss. 1969).

A corporation is doing business for purposes of requiring it to qualify to have access to the courts of Mississippi when the corporation enters the state and carries on a substantial part of its business there on a regular basis, and the question of whether a corporation is so doing business in the state is one of the facts to be determined by the circumstances of each particular case, and the corporation’s activities must be judged as a whole. Humboldt Foods, Inc. v. Massey, 297 F. Supp. 236, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7941 (N.D. Miss. 1968).

A Tennessee food processing corporation, which entered into a contract with five Mississippi planters under which the latter agreed to cultivate 1000 acres of green beans and the processor obligated itself to harvest and transport the beans, was not engaged in doing business in Mississippi, and was not prohibited from maintaining an action in federal court in that state, although not qualified to do business there. Humboldt Foods, Inc. v. Massey, 297 F. Supp. 236, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7941 (N.D. Miss. 1968).

A corporation is not doing business in Mississippi merely because it has employees or agents in the state to solicit orders to be transmitted to the principal, or to perform acts incidental to interstate commerce. Humboldt Foods, Inc. v. Massey, 297 F. Supp. 236, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7941 (N.D. Miss. 1968).

The penalty imposed against a foreign corporation doing business in Mississippi without having first qualified is that it shall not be permitted to avail itself of the state courts to enforce a cause of action accruing to it prior to the time it qualified to do business; but the contracts and other acts of a foreign corporation entered into or performed prior to its qualification are not rendered invalid. Wood v. Gulf States Capital Corp., 217 So. 2d 257, 1968 Miss. LEXIS 1259 (Miss. 1968).

A foreign credit corporation which has an agent in Mississippi for the purpose of calling upon prospective sellers of title retention notes to solicit and induce them to submit the collateral notes taken from their customers to the office of the credit corporation in Memphis, Tennessee, furnished an automobile to its agent for use in calling on manufacturers and dealers in Mississippi, and offered its services to dealers to collect delinquent money due on notes, or to recover the possession of property described in the notes, was not engaged in doing business in Mississippi within the purview of this section [Code 1942, § 5309-221]. Ross Constr. Co. v. U. M. & M. Credit Corp., 214 So. 2d 822, 1968 Miss. LEXIS 1336 (Miss. 1968).

A foreign corporation doing business in Mississippi without having qualified as required by statute cannot use the courts of this state to enforce any cause of action that accrued as the result of doing such business, and in order to avail itself of the state courts to enforce a cause of action, a foreign corporation doing business in the state must have qualified to do business when the cause of action accrued. Parker v. Lin-Co Producing Co., 197 So. 2d 228, 1967 Miss. LEXIS 1515 (Miss. 1967).

The statutory prohibition against bringing or maintaining actions or suits does not prevent a defendant from interposing defenses when sued nor preclude the asserting or recovering of a counterclaim. Smith v. Kincade, 232 F.2d 306, 1956 U.S. App. LEXIS 3022 (5th Cir. Miss. 1956).

Where a foreign corporation shipped its products f. o. b. from point outside the state to local dealers, who agreed to pay therefor and where the corporation also employed resident contract men to procure and recommend local dealers and investigate sureties on their performance bonds, the foreign corporation was not doing business in the state to such extent that the failure to qualify under this section [Code 1942, § 5319] would bar suits in courts of the state. J. R. Watkins Co. v. Flynt, 220 Miss. 871, 72 So. 2d 195, 1954 Miss. LEXIS 508 (Miss. 1954).

A foreign trading corporation having no office or place of business in this state, by employing a soliciting agent to obtain orders and send them to the home office, where they are filled by direct shipments to the purchasers, is not doing business in this state within the meaning of this section [Code 1942, § 5319]. Savell v. Schultz, Baujan & Co., 213 Miss. 427, 57 So. 2d 151, 1952 Miss. LEXIS 380 (Miss. 1952).

A foreign corporation which has failed to file a written power of attorney designating an agent on whom service of process may be had, in compliance with this section [Code 1942, § 5319], cannot maintain in a federal court an action, commenced on ground of diversity of citizenship, for a broker’s commission alleged to be due for the sale of real estate in the state, since this section [Code 1942, § 5319] also provides that a foreign corporation failing to comply with the above requirements shall not be permitted to bring or maintain any action or suit in any of the courts of the state. Woods v. Interstate Realty Co., 337 U.S. 535, 69 S. Ct. 1235, 93 L. Ed. 1524, 1949 U.S. LEXIS 2148 (U.S. 1949).

The Mississippi statutes deny to the noncomplying corporations permission to bring a suit in the state courts; but they do not prevent such a corporation from being sued upon its contracts in the state courts. Interstate Realty Co. v. Woods, 168 F.2d 701, 1948 U.S. App. LEXIS 2098 (5th Cir. Miss. 1948), rev'd, 337 U.S. 535, 69 S. Ct. 1235, 93 L. Ed. 1524, 1949 U.S. LEXIS 2148 (U.S. 1949).

A Tennessee corporation, which, through its agents, had contracted to sell real estate in Mississippi and in connection with sales had sent its agents into the state to meet prospective buyers and to show the properties to be sold, and which had admitted earnings from the sale of real estate in Mississippi over a period of years, was doing business in Mississippi within the meaning of this statute. Interstate Realty Co. v. Woods, 168 F.2d 701, 1948 U.S. App. LEXIS 2098 (5th Cir. Miss. 1948), rev'd, 337 U.S. 535, 69 S. Ct. 1235, 93 L. Ed. 1524, 1949 U.S. LEXIS 2148 (U.S. 1949).

In action on an account by a foreign corporation not authorized to do business in the state, where defendant’s plea and plaintiff’s replication raised issue whether plaintiff was doing business in the state, it was error to sustain demurrer to replication grounded on exhibits attached to the plea. W. T. Rawleigh Co. v. Lowry, 199 Miss. 107, 23 So. 2d 540, 1945 Miss. LEXIS 273 (Miss. 1945).

Foreign corporation, engaged in doing highway construction as its chief corporate function, was doing business in the state in the performance of a contract with the state highway commission for the construction of a link of state highway, within the purview of statutes requiring it to file a copy of its charter and designate an agent for the service of process. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

Performance of contract between foreign highway construction corporation and state highway commission for construction of a link of highway within state was not an isolated transaction within the rule that an isolated dealing within the state by a foreign corporation is not doing business in the state so as to require filing of copy of charter and designation of agent for service of process. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

The usual test of whether a foreign corporation is doing business within the meaning of the statutes is whether or not it is doing such acts as are within the function of its corporate powers, and where the business so performed is substantial in scope such corporation is held to be doing business. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

Permitting highway commission, in suit against it by foreign corporation to recover for damages for delay and additional compensation for extra work under contract with commission for construction of highway in state, to set up defense that corporation failed to qualify as a foreign corporation doing business in the state, after suit had been pending for three years and complainant had taken testimony for 20 days and rested, was not error, in absence of a showing that commission had notice of the noncompliance with the statutes prior to the taking of the evidence. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

Foreign corporation doing business in state in performance of contract with highway commission for construction of highway could not recover damages for delay occasioned by commission nor additional compensation for extra work performed under such contract during time it failed to comply with provision requiring filing of a copy of its charter and designation of an agent for service of process. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

To constitute a foreign corporation doing business in a particular jurisdiction, the business must be of such nature and character as to warrant the inference that the corporation has subjected itself to the local jurisdiction, and is by its duly authorized officers or agents present within the state where the service of process is attempted. Lee v. Memphis Pub. Co., 195 Miss. 264, 14 So. 2d 351, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 133 (Miss. 1943).

A foreign finance company was subject to the privilege tax imposed by Laws 1940, ch. 110 on the business of acquiring notes and other securities whereby title is retained until payment of the purchase price of tangible personal property sold on installment payment contracts and the like, notwithstanding that such company did not file its corporate charter nor qualify to do business within the meaning of this section [Code 1942, § 5319]. Stone v. General Electric Contracts Corp., 193 Miss. 317, 7 So. 2d 811, 1942 Miss. LEXIS 84 (Miss. 1942), limited, Lincoln Nat'l Life Ins. Co. v. State Tax Com., 196 Miss. 82, 16 So. 2d 369, 1944 Miss. LEXIS 170 (Miss. 1944).

Where the sale of phonograph instruments to Mississippi residents by an Illinois corporation, which had no resident agent and had not filed a copy of its charter, was made through a Texas distributor, and was interstate in character, the fact that the distributor, who was compensated by a sales commission, had some sort of an understanding with the purchasers that the instrument would be kept in repair by the distributor, and the distributor did from time to time render this service, did not operate to take away the interstate character of the sale so as to preclude the corporation from foreclosing a chattel mortgage on the instrument. Smith v. J. P. Seeburg Corp., 192 Miss. 563, 6 So. 2d 591, 1942 Miss. LEXIS 44 (Miss. 1942).

A foreign corporation sending agents into the state to solicit the purchase of reserve title purchase money contracts, and purchasing such contracts at its office outside of the state, was not doing business in the state within the meaning of the statute. Yellow Mfg. Acceptance Corp. v. American Oil Co., 191 Miss. 757, 2 So. 2d 834, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 161 (Miss. 1941).

A foreign corporation was not doing business in Mississippi within the meaning of the statute, where it appeared that it was engaged in the business of procuring loans, its local agent sending the applications to the corporation’s home office for examination, and acceptance or rejection, and, if accepted, the transaction in connection with the loan was conducted through the home office, and the corporation required the borrower to pay its commission for handling the loan at the home office, or to execute notes payable to it in the city in which its home office was located. The fact that local correspondents, who received and transmitted applications for loans to a foreign loan corporation, were or were not agents of the corporation, rather than of the borrower, was immaterial in determining that the corporation was not doing business within the state, and so was not subject to the requirement as to filing a copy of its charter and appointing an agent to receive service of process. Morrison v. Guaranty Mortg. & Trust Co., 191 Miss. 207, 199 So. 110, 1940 Miss. LEXIS 256 (Miss. 1940).

Under statute (Laws 1934, Ch. 121), imposing franchise tax on corporations “doing business” in the state, which was defined to include each and every act, power or privilege exercised or enjoyed in the state as an incident to or by virtue of the powers and privileges acquired by the nature of the organization, a foreign corporation is “doing business” in the state and is subject to tax as soon as it gets ready to be active by having property there and enjoying the protection of the state for it, and qualifies formally by filing its charter and naming its agent for the service of process. Stone v. Interstate Natural Gas Co., 103 F.2d 544, 1939 U.S. App. LEXIS 3610 (5th Cir. Miss.), aff'd, 308 U.S. 522, 60 S. Ct. 292, 84 L. Ed. 442, 1939 U.S. LEXIS 16 (U.S. 1939).

A foreign corporation engaged in the business of discounting for cash for dealers, installment sales contracts for the unpaid balances on electric refrigerators and other electrical equipment, was not doing business within the state within the purview of this section [Code 1942, § 5319], so as to deny it the right to bring suit in the state for failure to file its charter and appoint a process agent, where the assignment contract between such corporation and the dealer was executed outside the state, payments thereon were to be made at the corporation’s place of business outside the state, and the title was vested in such corporation until payment was so made, notwithstanding that the corporation sent its agent into the state after the execution of the assignment contract to learn how its business was being conducted. Refrigeration Discount Corp. v. Turley, 189 Miss. 880, 198 So. 731, 1940 Miss. LEXIS 159 (Miss. 1940).

A foreign corporation, executing a contract in Minnesota for the sale of goods at wholesale, to be sold by the other party thereto in Mississippi, which contract required the purchaser to report his sale to the corporation, to designate his sales territory, and to remit a percentage of the proceeds of such sale, and permitted him to return unsold goods, was not doing business in Mississippi so as to require it to file a copy of its charter with the secretary of state and to appoint such officer as its process agent, and so as to preclude its resort to the court for failure to comply with such requirement, such contract being a contract of sale and not a contract of agency. Watson v. J. R. Watkins Co., 188 Miss. 435, 193 So. 913, 1940 Miss. LEXIS 17 (Miss. 1940).

A foreign corporation, engaged in the business of buying trade acceptances, conditional contracts and other financial paper from dealers and others taking such contracts, but maintaining no office in the state and completing the purchase of such commercial paper at its offices in another state, was not “doing business” within the state so as to preclude its resort to the courts of the state for failure to file the appointment of an agent within the state for the service of process, notwithstanding that it sometimes sent its agents into the state to solicit a purchase of such contracts and commercial paper; and, accordingly, it was error for the court below to grant a peremptory instruction for the defendant and to enter judgment in accordance therewith in a replevin suit wherein a foreign corporation sought recovery of possession of a refrigerator upon default in payment of instalments of a reserve title contract which it has purchased and accepted at its office in Memphis, Tennessee. C. I. T. Corp. v. Stuart, 185 Miss. 140, 187 So. 204, 1939 Miss. LEXIS 124 (Miss. 1939).

One test of whether foreign corporation is “doing business” within state within statute barring suit by foreign corporation doing business in state which does not file power of attorney to receive service is whether it is doing such acts as are within the function of its corporate powers. Marx & Bensdorf, Inc. v. First Joint Stock Land Bank, 178 Miss. 345, 173 So. 297, 1937 Miss. LEXIS 213 (Miss. 1937).

Foreign corporation which, through agent, who was nonresident, maintained headquarters at hotel within state large part of agent’s time, advertised for realty brokerage business and realized $19,102.95 in commissions in three years for selling thirty-three tracts of land held “doing business” within state within statute barring suit by foreign corporation doing business in state which does not file power of attorney to receive service. Marx & Bensdorf, Inc. v. First Joint Stock Land Bank, 178 Miss. 345, 173 So. 297, 1937 Miss. LEXIS 213 (Miss. 1937).

Corporation incorporated under laws of foreign country purchasing commercial paper secured by trust deeds in state and collecting notes and foreclosing trust deeds by agent in state who leased property pending foreclosures to realize on mortgages held not “doing business in state” within statute requiring foreign corporation doing business in state to file charter with secretary of state and appoint agent for service of process. North American Mortg. Co. v. Hudson, 176 Miss. 266, 168 So. 79, 1936 Miss. LEXIS 120 (Miss. 1936).

Foreign corporation doing business within state, not having complied with regulatory statute, could not bring action in state on notes due it. Wiley Electric Co. v. Electric Storage Battery Co., 167 Miss. 842, 147 So. 773, 1933 Miss. LEXIS 101 (Miss. 1933).

Louisiana corporation which loaned money pursuant to negotiations through office in Louisana, though loans were secured by Mississippi realty, held not doing business in Mississippi so as to preclude foreclosure of trust deed without compliance with statute. Dodds v. Pyramid Sec. Co., 165 Miss. 269, 147 So. 328, 1933 Miss. LEXIS 298 (Miss. 1933).

In a diversity action by a Florida construction company in federal district court for Mississippi, seeking to recover a construction contract debt from the surety, a Mississippi bank, the trial court committed reversible error when it granted the bank’s motion for dismissal on the grounds that the foreign company had engaged in intrastate commerce without qualifying to do so as required by Mississippi law, and thus, was precluded from maintaining an action in Mississippi state or federal Court, where contract substantially related to interstate activities, where, under the National Bank Act, the bank was required to be sued where it was located, and where it would have been an impermissible burden on interstate commerce to permit Mississippi courtroom doors to remain closed to such foreign company on events and contracts substantially related to interstate activities. Diversacon Industries, Inc. v. National Bank of Commerce, 629 F.2d 1030, 1980 U.S. App. LEXIS 12640 (5th Cir. Miss. 1980).

A foreign corporation not authorized by statute to do business in Mississippi cannot resort either to the state or to the federal court sitting within the state to enforce its rights unless they arose from and were exempted as a transaction in interstate commerce. Cone Mills Corp. v. Hurdle, 369 F. Supp. 426, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12865 (N.D. Miss. 1974).

In practice, obtaining a Certificate of Authority from the Secretary of State qualifies the foreign corporation to do business in the state. Adams, Nov. 17, 2003, A.G. Op. 03-0596.

A School District should not necessarily assume that the foreign corporation is authorized to do business in Mississippi. The Mississippi Secretary of State can confirm whether or not a foreign corporation or contractor has been issued a Certificate of Authority. Adams, Nov. 17, 2003, A.G. Op. 03-0596.

Statutory requirements respecting issuance of corporate stock as applicable to foreign corporations.
8 A.L.R.2d 1185.

Foreign corporation’s purchase within state of goods to be shipped into other state or country as doing business within state for purpose of jurisdiction or service of process.
12 A.L.R.2d 1439.

Ownership or control by foreign corporation of stock of other corporation as constituting doing business within state.
18 A.L.R.2d 187.

Power of state to subject foreign corporation to jurisdiction of its courts on sole ground that corporation committed tort within state.
25 A.L.R.2d 1202.

What constitutes doing business within state by foreign magazine, newspaper, or other publishing corporation, for purposes other than taxation.
38 A.L.R.2d 747.

Leasing of real estate by foreign corporation, as lessor or lessee, as doing business within state within statutes prescribing conditions of right to do business.
59 A.L.R.2d 1131.

Holding directors’, officers’, or stockholders’, or sales meetings or conventions in a state by foreign corporation as doing business within the state.
84 A.L.R.2d 412.

Construction and application of state statutes and rules of court predicating in personam jurisdiction over nonresidents or foreign corporations on making or performing a contract within the state.
23 A.L.R.3d 551.

Construction and application as to isolated acts or transactions, of state statutes or rules of court predicating in personam jurisdiction over nonresidents or foreign corporations upon the doing of an act or upon doing or transacting business or “any” business, within a state.
27 A.L.R.3d 397.

Foreign corporation’s leasing of personal property as doing business within statutes prescribing conditions of right to business.
50 A.L.R.3d 1020.

Construction work by foreign corporation as doing business for purposes of statute requiring foreign corporation to qualify as condition of access to local courts.
90 A.L.R.3d 937.

State regulation of land ownership by alien corporation.
21 A.L.R.4th 1329.

Personal liability of stockholder, officer, or agent for debt of foreign corporation doing business in the state.
27 A.L.R.4th 387.

What constitutes doing business within state for purposes of state “closed door” statute barring unqualified or unregistered foreign corporation from local courts – modern cases.
88 A.L.R.4th 466.

Application of statute denying access to courts or invalidating contracts where corporation fails to comply with regulatory statute as affected by compliance after commencement of action.
23 A.L.R.5th 744.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 14- 16,
157 et seq.

2 Am. Jur. Trials 409, Locating Public Records.

3 Am. Jur. Trials 681, Tactics and Strategy of Pleading.

4 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 483, Doing Business.

20 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1813 et seq.

An analysis of Mississippi’s treatment of foreign corporations.
55 Miss. L. J. 259, June, 1985.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-15.02.
Consequences of transacting business without authority.

A foreign corporation transacting business in this state without a certificate of authority may not maintain a proceeding in any court in this state until it obtains a certificate of authority.

The successor to a foreign corporation that transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority and the assignee of a cause of action arising out of that business may not maintain a proceeding based on that cause of action in any court in this state until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains a certificate of authority.

A court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign corporation, its successor or assignee until it determines whether the foreign corporation or its successor requires a certificate of authority. If it so determines, the court may further stay the proceeding until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains the certificate.

A foreign corporation is liable for a civil penalty of Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each day, but not to exceed a total of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each year, it transacts business in this state without a certificate of authority. The Attorney General may collect all penalties due under this subsection.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), the failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority shall not impair the validity of any contract, deed, mortgage, security interest, lien or act of such foreign corporation or prevent the foreign corporation from defending any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.02; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 39, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (e).

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-363 through 79-11-381.

Mississippi’s closing-door statute, Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-15.02(a), did not foreclose the bank from enforcement of the notes and deeds of trust it assumed from a mortgage company because the mortgage company did not need a certificate of authority to enter into the mortgage transactions with the homeowners. Furthermore, the statute did not apply because the bank was merely defending the lawsuit brought by the homeowners. Carson v. McNeal, 375 F. Supp. 2d 509, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13166 (S.D. Miss. 2005).